Utah statutes.
63H-4-109.   Duty to maintain rails.

The authority shall maintain the rails, bed, right-of-way, and related property upon which the authority's train shall operate in compliance with state and federal statutes, rules, and regulations.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

